Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-6,103
Pharmacist; report; department; duty.

The pharmacist in charge of each pharmacy located within the state or doing business in the state shall file a semiannual report with the department listing persons to whom the pharmacist has dispensed drugs on the list of drugs required to be reported under this section for Parkinson's disease. The report shall include the name, address, and date of birth of the person for whom the drugs were prescribed and the name and address of the prescribing physician. The department shall issue a list of drugs used for the treatment of Parkinson's disease to be reported under this section, shall review and revise the list annually, and shall distribute the list to each pharmacy located within the state or doing business in the state.

Laws 2001, LB 152, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB755, § 33.